Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Chapter 19.1. College Partnership Laboratory Schools.

§ 22.1-349.1.
Definitions; objectives.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“At-risk student”
means a student having a physical, emotional, intellectual, socioeconomic, or cultural risk factor, as defined in Board criteria, that research indicates may negatively influence educational success.

“College partnership laboratory school”
means a public, nonsectarian, nonreligious school in the Commonwealth established by a public institution of higher education; public higher education center, institute, or authority; or an eligible institution as defined in §

23.1-628

. Notwithstanding the provisions of § 22.1-349.5, a public institution of higher education; a public higher education center, institute, or authority; or an eligible institution as defined in §

23.1-628

may submit an application for formation of a college partnership laboratory school.

“Governing board”
means the board of a college partnership laboratory school that is responsible for creating, managing, and operating the college partnership laboratory school and whose members have been selected by the institution of higher education that establishes the college partnership laboratory school. The governing board shall be under the control of the institution of higher education that establishes the college partnership laboratory school.

College partnership laboratory schools may be established as provided in this chapter to (i) stimulate the development of innovative programs for preschool through grade 12 students; (ii) provide opportunities for innovative instruction and assessment; (iii) provide teachers with a vehicle for establishing schools with alternative innovative instruction and school scheduling, management, and structure; (iv) encourage the use of performance-based educational programs; (v) establish high standards for both teachers and administrators; (vi) encourage greater collaboration between education providers from preschool to the postsecondary level; and (vii) develop models for replication in other public schools.

History.

2010, cc. 816, 871, § 23-299; 2012, cc. 176, 580; 2016, c. 588; 2022, , Sp. Sess. I, c. 2.

Editor’s note.

Chapter 26 (§ 23-299 et seq.) of Title 23 is recodified as this chapter (§ 22.1-349.1 et seq.), effective October 1, 2016, by Acts 2016, c. 588.
Where appropriate, the historical citations to former sections have been added to corresponding new sections. For full transition provisions related to the recodification of Title 23, see Editor’s notes under §

23.1-100

. For tables of corresponding former and new sections, see the tables in Volume 10.

The 2022 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2022 Sp. Sess. I amendment by c. 2, cl. 17, substituted “; public higher education center, institute, or authority; or an eligible institution as defined in §

23.1-628

” for “or private institution that operates a teacher education program approved by the Board” and added the second sentence.

§ 22.1-349.2.
College Partnership Laboratory School Fund.

There is created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the College Partnership Laboratory School Fund, referred to in this section as “the Fund.” The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. All funds appropriated in accordance with the general appropriation act and any gifts, grants, bequests, or donations from public or private sources shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to the Fund. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall be used solely for the purposes of establishing or supporting college partnership laboratory schools that stimulate the development of alternative education programs for preschool through grade 12 students by providing opportunities for innovative instruction and greater cooperation and coordination between institutions of higher education and preschool through grade 12 education systems. Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon written request signed by the Superintendent of Public Instruction. The Board shall establish criteria for making distributions from the Fund to a college partnership laboratory school requesting moneys from the Fund and may issue guidelines governing the Fund as it deems necessary and appropriate.

History.

2010, cc. 816, 871, § 23-299.1; 2016, c. 588.

§ 22.1-349.3.
Establishment and operation of college partnership laboratory schools; requirements.

A college partnership laboratory school is subject to all federal and state laws and regulations and constitutional provisions prohibiting discrimination on the basis of disability, race, creed, color, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, religion, ancestry, or need for special education services.

Enrollment in college partnership laboratory schools shall be open through a lottery process on a space-available basis to any student who is deemed to reside within the Commonwealth. A waiting list shall be established if adequate space is not available to accommodate all students whose parents have requested to be entered in the lottery process. Such waiting list shall also be prioritized through a lottery process, and parents shall be informed of their student’s position on the list. For college partnership laboratory schools that form a collaborative partnership with one or more local school divisions in accordance with subsection G, enrollment in the college partnership laboratory school shall be administered by one of the partnering divisions.

A college partnership laboratory school shall be administered and managed by a governing board. Pursuant to a contract and as specified in § 22.1-349.4, a college partnership laboratory school is subject to the requirements of the Standards of Quality, including the Standards of Learning and the Standards of Accreditation, and such regulations as are determined by the Board.

Pursuant to a college partnership laboratory school agreement, a college partnership laboratory school is responsible for its own operations, including such budget preparation, contracts for services, and personnel matters as are specified in the agreement. A college partnership laboratory school may also negotiate and contract with a school board, the governing body of an institution of higher education, or any third party for the use of a school building or grounds, the operation and maintenance of such building or grounds, and the provision of any service, activity, or undertaking that the college partnership laboratory school is required to perform in order to carry out the educational program described in its contract. Any services for which a college partnership laboratory school contracts with a school board or institution of higher education shall not exceed the cost to the school division or institution to provide such services.

No college partnership laboratory school shall charge tuition for courses required for high school graduation. However, (i) tuition may be charged for courses for which the student receives college credit and enrichment courses that are not required to earn a Board-approved high school diploma and (ii) for college partnership laboratory schools that form a collaborative partnership with one or more local school divisions in accordance with subsection G, the school board of the partnering school division that administers student enrollment in accordance with subsection A may charge tuition in accordance with § 22.1-5 for students who do not reside within the partnering school division.

An approved college partnership laboratory school shall be designated as a local education agency but shall not constitute a school division.

College partnership laboratory schools are encouraged to develop collaborative partnerships with local school divisions for the purpose of building seamless education opportunities for all preschool through postsecondary students in the Commonwealth. An educational program provided to students enrolled in a local school division pursuant to a collaborative partnership between the college partnership laboratory school and the local school division is the educational program of the local school division for purposes of the Standards of Accreditation.

History.

2010, cc. 816, 871, § 23-299.2; 2012, cc. 176, 580; 2014, c. 754; 2016, c. 588; 2020, c. 1137.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1137 substituted “sex, sexual orientation, gender identity” for “gender” in subdivision A.

§ 22.1-349.4.
Contracts for college partnership laboratory schools; release from certain policies and regulations.

The contract between the college partnership laboratory school and the Board shall reflect all agreements regarding the release of the college partnership laboratory school from state regulations, consistent with the requirements of subsection C of § 22.1-349.3. If the college partnership laboratory school application proposes a program to increase the educational opportunities for at-risk students, the Board may approve an Individual School Accreditation Plan for the evaluation of the performance of the school.

Any material revision of the terms of the contract may be made only with the approval of the Board and the governing board of the college partnership laboratory school.

History.

2010, cc. 816, 871, § 23-299.3; 2016, c. 588.

§ 22.1-349.5.
College partnership laboratory school application.

Any public institution of higher education or private institution of higher education that has a teacher education program approved by the Board may submit an application for formation of a college partnership laboratory school.

Each college partnership laboratory school application shall provide or describe thoroughly all of the following essential elements of the proposed school plan:

An executive summary;

The mission and vision of the proposed college partnership laboratory school, including identification of the targeted student population;

The proposed location of the school;

The grades to be served each year for the full term of the contract;

Minimum, planned, and maximum enrollment per grade per year for the term of the contract;

Background information on the proposed founding governing board members and, if identified, the proposed school leadership and management team;

The school’s proposed calendar and sample daily schedule;

A description of the academic program aligned with state standards;

A description of the school’s educational program, including the type of learning environment, such as classroom-based or independent study; class size and structure; curriculum overview; and teaching methods;

The school’s plan for using internal and external assessments to measure and report student progress in accordance with the Standards of Learning;

The school’s plans for identifying and successfully serving students with disabilities, students who are English language learners, students who are academically behind, and gifted students, including compliance with applicable laws and regulations;

A description of co-curricular and extracurricular programs and how they will be funded and delivered;

Plans and timelines for student recruitment and enrollment, including lottery procedures if sufficient space is unavailable;

The school’s student disciplinary policies, including disciplinary policies for special education students;

An organization chart that clearly presents the school’s organizational structure, including lines of authority and reporting between the governing board, staff, any related bodies such as advisory bodies or parent and teacher councils, the Board, and any external organizations that will play a role in managing the school;

A clear description of the roles and responsibilities for the governing board, the school’s leadership and management team, and any other entities shown in the organization chart;

A staffing chart for the school’s first year and a staffing plan for the term of the contract;

Plans for recruiting and developing school leadership and staff;

The school’s leadership and teacher employment policies, including performance evaluation plans;

A plan for the placement of college partnership laboratory school students, teachers, and employees upon termination or revocation of the contract;

Explanation of any partnerships or contractual relationships central to the school’s operations or mission;

The school’s plans for providing transportation, food service, and all other significant operational or ancillary services;

Opportunities and expectations for parent involvement;

A detailed school start-up plan that identifies tasks, timelines, and responsible individuals;

A description of the school’s financial plan and policies, including financial controls and audit requirements;

A description of the insurance coverage that the school will obtain;

Start-up and five-year budgets with clearly stated assumptions;

Start-up and first-year cash-flow projections with clearly stated assumptions;

Evidence of anticipated fundraising contributions, if claimed in the application;

A sound facilities plan, including backup or contingency plans if appropriate; and

Assurances that the college partnership laboratory school (i) is nonreligious in its programs, admission policies, employment practices, and all other operations and (ii) does not charge tuition, except as described in subsection E of § 22.1-349.3.

The purposes of the college partnership laboratory school application are to present the proposed school’s academic and operational vision and plans, demonstrate the applicant’s capacities to execute the proposed vision and plans, and provide the Board with a clear basis for assessing the applicant’s plans and capacities. An approved college partnership laboratory school application shall not serve as the school’s contract. Within 90 days of approval of a college partnership laboratory school application, the Board and the governing board of the approved school shall execute a contract that clearly sets forth the academic and operational performance expectations and measures by which the college partnership laboratory school will be judged and the administrative relationship between the Board and the college partnership laboratory school, including each party’s rights and duties. The performance expectations and measures set forth in the contract shall include applicable federal and state accountability requirements. The performance provisions may be refined or amended by mutual agreement after the college partnership laboratory school is operating and has collected baseline achievement data for its enrolled students.

History.

2010, cc. 816, 871, § 23-299.4; 2012, cc. 176, 580; 2016, c. 588.

§ 22.1-349.6.
Review of college partnership laboratory school applications.

The Board shall establish procedures for receiving, reviewing, and ruling upon applications and shall make a copy of any such procedures available to all interested parties upon request. If the Board finds that the application is incomplete, the Board shall request the necessary additional information from the applicant. The Board’s review procedures shall establish a review committee that may include experts with the operation of similar schools located in other states.

To provide appropriate opportunity for input from parents, teachers, and other interested parties and to obtain information to assist the Board in its evaluation of a college partnership laboratory school application, the Board may establish a procedure for public notice, comment, or hearings on such applications.

History.

2010, cc. 816, 871, § 23-299.5; 2016, c. 588.

§ 22.1-349.7.
Decision of the Board final.

The decision of the Board to grant or deny a college partnership laboratory school application or to revoke or fail to renew an agreement is final and is not subject to appeal.

History.

2010, cc. 816, 871, § 23-299.6; 2016, c. 588.

§ 22.1-349.8.
College partnership laboratory school terms; renewals and revocations.

A college partnership laboratory school may be approved or renewed for a period not to exceed five school years. A college partnership laboratory school renewal application submitted to the Board shall contain:

A report on the progress of the school in achieving the goals, objectives, program and performance standards for students, and such other conditions and terms as the Board may require upon granting initial approval of the college partnership laboratory school application; and

A financial statement, on forms prescribed by the Board, that discloses the costs of administration, instruction, and other spending categories for the school and that has been concisely and clearly written to enable the Board and the public to compare such costs with those of other schools or comparable organizations.

The Board may revoke a contract if the college partnership laboratory school does any of the following or otherwise fails to comply with the provisions of this chapter:

Commits a material and substantial violation of any of the terms, conditions, standards, or procedures required under this chapter or the contract;

Fails to meet or make sufficient progress toward the performance expectations set forth in the contract;

Fails to meet generally accepted standards of fiscal management; or

Substantially violates any material provision of law from which the college partnership laboratory school was not exempted.

If the Board revokes or does not renew a college partnership laboratory school contract, it shall clearly state, in a resolution, the reasons for the revocation or nonrenewal.

History.

2010, cc. 816, 871, § 23-299.7; 2016, c. 588.

§ 22.1-349.9.
Employment of professional, licensed personnel.

College partnership laboratory school personnel are employees of the institution of higher education that establishes the school.

Teachers who work in a college partnership laboratory school shall hold a license issued by the Board or, in the case of an instructor in the Board-approved teacher education program of the institution of higher education, be eligible to hold a Virginia teaching license. Teachers working in a college partnership laboratory school are subject to the requirements of §§ 22.1-296.1, 22.1-296.2, and 22.1-296.4 applicable to teachers employed by a local school board.

Professional, licensed personnel of a college partnership laboratory school shall be granted the same employment benefits given to professional, licensed personnel in public schools in accordance with the agreement between the college partnership laboratory school and the Board.

History.

2010, cc. 816, 871, § 23-299.8; 2012, c. 170; 2016, c. 588.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, deleted “higher education institution’s” preceding “Board-approved teacher education program” and inserted “of the institution of higher education” in subsection B to conform to Acts 2016, c. 588.

§ 22.1-349.10.
Funding of college partnership laboratory schools.

Each college partnership laboratory school shall receive such funds as may be appropriated by the General Assembly in accordance with the general appropriation act.

The governing board of a college partnership laboratory school may accept gifts, donations, or grants of any kind and spend such funds in accordance with the conditions prescribed by the donor. However, no gift, donation, or grant shall be accepted by the governing board of a college partnership laboratory school if the conditions for such funds are contrary to law or the terms of the agreement between the Board and the college partnership laboratory school.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the proportionate share of state and federal resources allocated for students with disabilities and school personnel assigned to special education programs shall be directed to college partnership laboratory schools enrolling such students. The proportionate share of moneys allocated under other federal or state categorical aid programs shall be directed to college partnership laboratory schools serving students eligible for such aid.

College partnership laboratory schools are eligible to apply for and receive any federal or state funds otherwise allocated for college partnership laboratory schools.

The collection of any tuition, room and board, and other educational and related fees from students enrolled at a college partnership laboratory school shall comply with Board regulations and shall be credited to the account of such school.

Each college partnership laboratory school is eligible to apply for and receive available funds from the College Partnership Laboratory School Fund and the institution of higher education that establishes the school.

History.

2010, cc. 816, 871, § 23-299.9; 2012, cc. 176, 580; 2016, c. 588.

§ 22.1-349.11.
Immunity.

A college partnership laboratory school is immune from liability to the same extent as is the public institution of higher education that establishes the school, and the employees and volunteers in a college partnership laboratory school are immune from liability to the same extent as are the employees of the institution of higher education that establishes the school.

History.

2010, cc. 816, 871, § 23-299.10; 2016, c. 588.